Utah statutes.
32B-11-607.   Commission and department duties before issuing local representative license.

(1) (a)  Before the commission may issue a local industry representative license, the department shall conduct an investigation and may hold public hearings to gather information and make recommendations to the commission as to whether a local industry representative license should be issued.

(b)  The department shall forward the information and recommendations described in Subsection (1)(a) to the commission to aid in the commission's determination.

(2)  Before issuing a local industry representative license, the commission shall:

(a)  determine that the person filed a complete application and is in compliance with Sections 32B-11-604 and 32B-11-606;

(b)  determine that the person is not disqualified under Section 32B-1-304; and

(c)  consider any other factor the commission considers necessary.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

